Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of Land Conservation and  Devel-
opment, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the following
amounts, for the following purposes:
(1) Planning program ..................... $ 15,412,776
(2) Grant programs ........................ $ 1,781,089
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,755,120 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of
Land Conservation and Development.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$9,215,256 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Department  of Land
Conservation and Development.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled House Bill 5027 (HB 5027-A) Page 1
Passed by House May 15, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5027 (HB 5027-A) Page 2